Washington statutes.
RCW 15.24.120

Records kept by dealers, handlers, processors.

Each dealer, handler, and processor shall keep a complete and accurate record of all apples handled, shipped, or processed by him or her. This record shall be in such form and contain such information as the commission may by rule or regulation prescribe, and shall be preserved for a period of two prior crop years, and be subject to inspection at any time upon demand of the commission or its agents.

[ 2016 sp.s. c 15 s 10; 2010 c 8 s 6021; 1961 c 11 s 15.24.120. Prior: 1937 c 195 s 10; RRS s 2874-10.]